Georgia, session 2025_26, SB332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to create and establish in DeKalb County, Georgia, districts from which the members
of the County Board of Education of DeKalb County shall be elected, approved April 12,
1963 (Ga. L. 1963, p. 3424), as amended, particularly by an Act approved March 14, 1984
(Ga. L. 1984, p. 4192), and an Act approved May 10, 2021 (Ga. L. 2021, p. 4256), is
amended in Section 3 by revising subsection (a) as follows:
S. B. 332
- 1 -

LC 47 3630S (SCS)
"(a) The members of the board of education of DeKalb County serving at the time this Act
becomes effective shall continue to serve out the terms of office to which they were
elected. Their successors shall be elected by electors residing within the boundaries of the
DeKalb County school district, and they shall take office and serve for the term of office
as provided in this Act."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by adding a new subsection to Section 3.2 to read as follows:
"(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, this section shall
not apply to an annexation achieved through the adoption of a local Act of the General
Assembly that affects a single residential parcel of property that does not exceed one acre
in size; provided, however, that no more than four such annexations per calendar year shall
be exempted pursuant to this subsection."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 332
- 2 -